Tennessee, session 114, HB1466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each LEA and public charter school shall administer the Presidential Fitness
Test established by Executive Order No. 14327 of the president of the United States on
July 31, 2025, to students in order to assess their strength, endurance, and flexibility.
(b) The department of education shall advise each LEA and public charter
school in writing, no less than thirty (30) days before the start of the school year during
which the Presidential Fitness Test will be administered, of the requirements for students
to earn the Presidential Fitness Award. The requirements for a student to earn the
Presidential Fitness Award must be the same as those established by the President's
Council on Sports, Fitness, and Nutrition established by Executive Order No. 14327 of
the president of the United States on July 31, 2025.
(c)
HB1466
009639
- 1 -

(1) Each LEA and public charter school shall provide a student with an
individualized education program (IEP) under the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act (20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) or a Section 504 plan under the
Rehabilitation Act (29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.) with any reasonable and appropriate
accommodations on the Presidential Fitness Test, as may be recommended or
required by the President's Council on Sports, Fitness, and Nutrition. This
section does not require a student with an IEP or Section 504 plan to be
administered the Presidential Fitness Test if the student is unable to participate in
the Presidential Fitness Test safely, with or without an accommodation.
(2) The Presidential Fitness Test may be administered by an LEA or
public charter school during a physical education class or any other period of
physical activity required pursuant to § 49-6-1021.
(3) A student's performance on the Presidential Fitness Test must not
negatively affect the student's grade in any class or subject, including a physical
education class required pursuant to § 49-6-1021.
(d) The Presidential Fitness Test must be administered to students in
accordance with this section each school year for which the department provides LEAs
and public charter schools with the written notice required in subsection (b).
(e) If authorization for the Presidential Fitness Test is revoked on or after the
effective date of this act, then the department shall immediately notify each LEA and
public charter school in writing of any such revocation and shall submit a report to the
education committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives
having jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) education no later than
ninety (90) days from the date of the revocation that provides, for each school year for
which the Presidential Fitness Test was administered, the number of students:
- 2 - 009639

(1) Enrolled in each LEA and public charter school in a grade level for
which the Presidential Fitness Test was administered;
(2) Who participated in the Presidential Fitness Test at each LEA and
public charter school, disaggregated by:
(A) Grade level; and
(B) The number of students in each grade level with an IEP or
Section 504 plan, further disaggregated by the number of students who
received an accommodation on the Presidential Fitness Test; and
(3) Who received the Presidential Fitness Award.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 009639